Utah statutes.
35A-8-1902.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Account" means the Youth Development Organization Restricted Account created in Section 35A-8-1903.

(2)  "Qualified youth development organization council" means a youth development organization council in the state that the division determines to be eligible to receive a distribution under Section 35A-8-1904.

(3)  "Youth development organization" means an organization that:

(a)  is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3), Internal Revenue Code;

(b)  has more than 180,000 youth members within the state;

(c)  has as its mission to prepare youth members to make ethical and moral choices over their lifetimes; and

(d)  accomplishes the mission described in Subsection (3)(c) by building character, teaching citizenship, and developing personal fitness.

(4)  "Youth development organization council" means a council that:

(a)  is chartered by a youth development organization;

(b)  is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3), Internal Revenue Code;

(c)  has more than 35,000 youth members within the state;

(d)  covers a specified geographic area within the state;

(e)  has as its mission to prepare youth members to make ethical and moral choices over their lifetimes; and

(f)  accomplishes the mission described in Subsection (4)(e) by building character, teaching citizenship, and developing personal fitness.

(5)  "Youth member" means a person who:

(a)  has a valid membership in a youth development organization;

(b)  is affiliated with a particular youth development organization council; and

(c)  is 20 years of age or younger.



Enacted by Chapter 338, 2013 General Session

